California statutes. Vehicle Code
A “remanufactured vehicle” is a vehicle that has been constructed by a licensed remanufacturer and consists of any used or reconditioned integral parts, including, but not limited to, frame, engine, transmission, axles, brakes, or suspension. Remanufactured vehicles may be sold under a distinctive trade name. An existing vehicle which is incidently repaired, restored, or modified by replacing or adding parts or accessories is not a remanufactured vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

507.8.

A “remanufacturer” is any person who for commission, money, or other thing of value, produces a vehicle that consists of any used or reconditioned integral parts, including, but not limited to, frame, engine, transmission, axles, brakes, or suspension which is subject to registration under this code. A remanufacturer is not a person who incidently repairs, restores, or modifies an existing vehicle by replacing or adding parts or accessories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

A “renter” is a person who is engaged in the business of renting, leasing or bailing vehicles for a term not exceeding four months and for a fixed rate or price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

510.

A “repair shop” is a place where vehicles subject to registration under this code are repaired, rebuilt, reconditioned, repainted, or in any way maintained for the public at a charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

A “representative” is any person regularly employed by a manufacturer or distributor for the purpose of negotiating or promoting the sale of the manufacturer’s or distributer’s vehicles to their franchisees or for regularly supervising or contacting franchisees or prospective franchisees in this state for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

A “residence district” is that portion of a highway and the property contiguous thereto, other than a business district, (a) upon one side of which highway, within a distance of a quarter of a mile, the contiguous property fronting thereon is occupied by 13 or more separate dwelling houses or business structures, or (b) upon both sides of which highway, collectively, within a distance of a quarter of a mile, the contiguous property fronting thereon is occupied by 16 or more separate dwelling houses or business structures. A residence district may be longer than one-quarter of a mile if the above ratio of separate dwelling houses or business structures to the length of the highway exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

“Resident” means any person who manifests an intent to live or be located in this state on more than a temporary or transient basis. Presence in the state for six months or more in any 12-month period gives rise to a rebuttable presumption of residency.

The following are evidence of residency for purposes of vehicle registration: 

(a) Address where registered to vote. 

(b) Location of employment or place of business. 

(c) Payment of resident tuition at a public institution of higher education. 

(d) Attendance of dependents at a primary or secondary school. 

(e) Filing a homeowner’s property tax exemption. 

(f) Renting or leasing a home for use as a residence. 

(g) Declaration of residency to obtain a license or any other privilege or benefit not ordinarily extended to a nonresident. 

(h) Possession of a California driver’s license. 

(i) Other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the state is more than temporary or transient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 17.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

520.

A “retail sale” is a sale of goods to a person for the purpose of consumption and use, and not for resale to others, including, but not limited to, an arrangement where a motor vehicle is consigned to a dealer for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

A “retarder” is a device, other than a brake, which, when activated by the driver, applies a retarding force to the wheels of a vehicle without the use of friction. A retarder may be installed in or on the engine, exhaust system, drive train, or wheels of a motor vehicle, or an axle or wheels of a towed vehicle. A retarder may operate by altering the valve timing of the engine, by controlling the flow of a circulating fluid, by applying an electromagnetic force, by controlling the release of gases from the exhaust system, or by other means. A retarder may or may not be capable of stopping the vehicle upon which it is installed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

521.5.

“Revived salvage vehicle” means a total loss salvage vehicle as defined in Section 544, or a vehicle reported for dismantling pursuant to Section 5500 or 11520, that has been rebuilt or restored to legal operating condition with new or used component parts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

“Ridesharing” means two or more persons traveling by any mode, including, but not limited to, carpooling, vanpooling, buspooling, taxipooling, jitney, and public transit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 185, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

525.

“Right-of-way” is the privilege of the immediate use of the highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

(a) “Road” means any existing vehicle route established before January 1, 1979, with significant evidence of prior regular travel by vehicles subject to registration pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Division 3; provided, that “road” does not mean any route traversed exclusively by bicycles as defined in Section 39001, motorcycles as defined in Section 400, motor-driven cycles as defined in Section 405, or off-highway motor vehicles as defined in Section 38012.

(b) Even though nature may alter or eliminate portions of an existing vehicle route, the route shall still be considered a road where there is evidence of periodic use.

(c) A vehicle route need not necessarily be a publicly or privately maintained surface to be a road, as defined, for purposes of this section. Nothing contained herein shall pertain to any property in an incorporated area or properties held in private ownership.

(d) This section is definitional only and nothing contained herein shall be deemed to affect, alter, create, or destroy any right, title, or interest in real property, including, but not limited to, any permit, license, or easement; nor shall this chapter be deemed to affect the liability, or lack thereof, of any owner of an interest of real property based upon the use, possession, or ownership of such interest in real property or the entry upon such property by any person. 

(e) This section shall only apply in a county where the board of supervisors has adopted a resolution or enacted an ordinance providing for such application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

530.

A “roadway” is that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

“Utility-terrain vehicle” means a motor vehicle subject to subdivision (a) of Section 38010 that is all of the following:

(a) Designed for operation off of the highway.

(b) Suspended on four tires.

(c) Has a steering wheel for steering control.

(d) Has one seat to accommodate a driver and one passenger sitting side by side.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

535.

Safety glazing material is any glazing material so constructed, treated, or combined with other materials as to reduce, in comparison with ordinary sheet, plate, or floatglass, the likelihood of injury to persons by glazing material whether it may be broken or unbroken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

540.

A “safety zone” is the area or space lawfully set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected, or which is marked or indicated by vertical signs, raised markers or raised buttons, in order to make such area or space plainly visible at all times while the same is set apart as a safety zone.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

543.

“Salvage pool” means a person engaged exclusively in the business of disposing of total loss salvage vehicles, nonrepairable vehicles, or recovered stolen vehicles sent to it by, or on behalf of, insurance companies, authorized adjusters, leasing companies, self-insured persons, or financial institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

543.5.

“Salvage vehicle rebuilder” means any person who rebuilds a total loss salvage vehicle, as defined in Section 544, or a vehicle reported for dismantling pursuant to Section 11520, for subsequent resale. A person who, for personal use, rebuilds a total loss salvage vehicle, or a vehicle reported for dismantling, and registers that vehicle in his or her name, is not a salvage vehicle rebuilder. Nothing in this section exempts a salvage vehicle rebuilder from any applicable licensing requirements under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

544.

“Total loss salvage vehicle” means either of the following:

(a) A vehicle, other than a nonrepairable vehicle, of a type subject to registration that has been wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, to the extent that the owner, leasing company, financial institution, or the insurance company that insured or is responsible for repair of the vehicle, considers it uneconomical to repair the vehicle and because of this, the vehicle is not repaired by or for the person who owned the vehicle at the time of the event resulting in damage.

(b) A vehicle that was determined to be uneconomical to repair, for which a total loss payment has been made by an insurer, whether or not the vehicle is subsequently repaired, if prior to or upon making the payment to the claimant, the insurer obtains the agreement of the claimant to the amount of the total loss settlement, and informs the client that, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 11515, the total loss settlement must be reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles, which will issue a salvage certificate for the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

545.

(a) A “schoolbus” is a motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of any school pupil at or below the 12th grade level to or from a public or private school or to or from public or private school activities, except the following:

(1) A motor vehicle of any type carrying only members of the household of the owner of the vehicle.

(2) A motortruck transporting pupils who are seated only in the passenger compartment, or a passenger vehicle designed for and carrying not more than 10 persons, including the driver, unless the vehicle or truck is transporting two or more disabled pupils confined to wheelchairs.

(3) A motor
 vehicle operated by a common carrier, or by and under the exclusive jurisdiction of a publicly owned or operated transit system, only during the time it is on a scheduled run and is available to the general public, or on a run scheduled in response to a request from a disabled pupil confined to a wheelchair, or from a parent of the disabled pupil, for transportation to or from nonschool activities, and the motor vehicle is designed for and actually carries not more than 16 persons including the driver, is available to eligible persons of the general public, and the school does not provide the requested transportation service.

(4) A school pupil activity bus.

(5) A motor vehicle operated by a carrier licensed by the federal Surface Transportation Board that is transporting pupils on a school activity entering or returning to the state from another state or country.

(6) A youth bus.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the governing board of a district maintaining a community college may, by resolution, designate any motor vehicle operated by or for the district, a schoolbus within the meaning of this section, if it is primarily used for the transportation of community college students to or from a public community college or to or from public community college activities. The designation shall not be effective until written notification thereof has been filed with the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(8) A state-owned motor vehicle being operated by a state employee upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or grounds specified in Section 21113 that are under the control of a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of
 Developmental Services if the posted speed limit is not more than 20 miles per hour. The motor vehicle may also be operated for a distance of not more than one-quarter mile upon a public street or highway that runs through the grounds of a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services, if the posted speed limit on the public street or highway is not more than 25 miles per hour and if all traffic is regulated by posted stop signs or official traffic control signals at the points of entry and exit by the motor vehicle.

(9) A general public paratransit vehicle, if the general public paratransit vehicle does not duplicate existing schoolbus service, does not transport a public school pupil at or below the 12th grade level to a destination outside of that pupil’s school district, and is not used to transport public school pupils in areas where schoolbus services were available during the 1986–87 school year.
 In areas where expanded school services require expanded transportation of public school pupils, as determined by the governing board of a school district, general public paratransit vehicles shall not be used to transport those pupils for a period of three years from the date that a need for expansion is identified. For purposes of this section, a pupil is defined as a student at or below the 12th grade level who is being transported to a mandated school activity.

(10) A schoolbus with the flashing red light signal system, the amber warning system, and the schoolbus signs covered, while being used for transportation of persons other than pupils, to or from school or school-related activities.

(11) A motor vehicle, other than a motor vehicle described in paragraph (2), that is designed to carry not more than 25 persons including the driver, while being used for the transportation
 of pupils to or from school-related activities if the vehicle is operated by a passenger charter-party carrier certified and licensed by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code that is not under a contractual agreement with a school or school district, and the transportation does not duplicate schoolbus service or any other transportation services for pupils contracted, arranged, or otherwise provided by the school or school district.

(b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the use of a schoolbus for any activity authorized by any other law, including Section 39837.5 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 208.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

545.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 545, a motor vehicle is not a schoolbus if it is operated for the purpose of transporting any pupil to or from a community college or to or from activities at that college, irrespective of the age of the pupil or the grade level of the pupil, if the pupil is a current enrollee in classes of the college providing the transportation.

(b) A driver of a motor vehicle that meets the criteria established by subdivision (a) shall escort pupils as required by subdivision (d) of Section 22112 and shall meet the requirements of Section 12517.

(c) This section shall apply to a community college district that includes within its boundaries one or more counties, each of which has a population of 250,000 or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

545.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 545, a bus of the type commonly known as a coach bus is not a schoolbus when it is operated by the Trona Unified School District to transport pupils to route-deviated school activities.

(b) A coach bus operated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be inspected annually by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall meet the equipment safety standards established by the federal government for schoolbuses, and shall be used to transport pupils only if the driver has obtained a certificate to operate a schoolbus pursuant to Section 12517.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

546.

A “school pupil activity bus” is any motor vehicle, other than a schoolbus, operated by a common carrier, or by and under the exclusive jurisdiction of a publicly owned or operated transit system, or by a passenger charter-party carrier, used under a contractual agreement between a school and carrier to transport school pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school activity, or used to transport pupils to or from residential schools, when the pupils are received and discharged at off-highway locations where a parent or adult designated by the parent is present to accept the pupil or place the pupil on the bus. As used in this section, common carrier, publicly owned or operated transit system, and passenger charter-party carrier refer to carriers in business for the principal purpose of transporting members of the public on a commercial basis. This section shall not apply to a motor vehicle operated by a carrier licensed by the Interstate Commerce Commission that is transporting pupils on a school activity trip entering or returning to the state from another state or country.

The driver of a school pupil activity bus shall be subject to the regulations adopted by the California Highway Patrol governing schoolbus drivers, except that the regulations shall not require drivers to duplicate training or schooling that they have otherwise received which is equivalent to that required pursuant to the regulations, and the regulations shall not require drivers to take training in first aid. However, a valid certificate to drive a school pupil activity bus shall not entitle the bearer to drive a schoolbus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 813, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

550.

A “semitrailer” is a vehicle designed for carrying persons or property, used in conjunction with a motor vehicle, and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon, or is carried by, another vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

“Shade trailer” means a device designed and utilized to provide shade pursuant to Section 3395 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 168, Sec. 2.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

“Shared mobility device” means an electrically motorized board, as defined in Section 313.5, motorized scooter, as defined in Section 407.5, electric bicycle, as defined in Section 312.5, bicycle, as defined in Section 231, or other similar personal transportation device, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 415, that is made available to the public by a shared mobility device service provider for shared use and transportation in exchange for financial compensation via a digital application or other electronic or digital platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   (AB 2174)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

“Sidewalk” is that portion of a highway, other than the roadway, set apart by curbs, barriers, markings or other delineation for pedestrian travel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 979.)
-------------------------------------------

557.

A “snowmobile” is a motor vehicle designed to travel over ice or snow in whole or in part on skis, belts, or cleats, which is commonly referred to as an Over Snow Vehicle (OSV).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

A “snow-tread tire” is a tire which has a relatively deep and aggressive tread pattern compared with conventional passenger tread pattern.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

560.

A “solid tire” is a tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air for the support of the load. A nonpneumatic tire, as defined in Section 571.129 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, is not a “solid tire” for purposes of complying with Division 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 219, Sec. 4.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

565.

“Special construction equipment” is:

(a) Any vehicle used primarily off the highways for construction purposes and which moves only occasionally over the highways and which because of the length, height, width, or unladen weight may not move over the public highways unladen without the permit specified in Section 35780.

(b) Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily either for grading of highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction work on highways, or for construction or maintenance work on railroad rights-of-way, and which is not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property and which is only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but is not limited to, road and railroad construction and maintenance machinery so designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, tracktype tractors, crawler tractors, ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls, lighting plants, welders, pumps, water wagons, power shovels and draglines, speed swings, skip loaders, weed mowers, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery, including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which either (1) are in excess of 96 inches in width or (2) which, because of their length, height or unladen weight, may not be moved on a public highway without the permit specified in Section 35780 of this code and which are not operated laden except within the boundaries of the job construction site, and other similar types of construction equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

570.

“Special construction equipment” does not include any of the following:

(a) A vehicle originally designed for the transportation of persons or property to which machinery has been attached unless specifically designated as such in Section 565.

(b) Dump trucks originally designed to comply with the size and weight provisions of this code notwithstanding any subsequent modification which would require a permit, as specified in Section 35780 of this code, to operate such vehicles on a highway, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1659.)
-------------------------------------------

575.

“Special mobile equipment” is a vehicle, not self-propelled, not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property, and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway, excepting implements of husbandry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

580.

A “specially constructed vehicle” is a vehicle which is built for private use, not for resale, and is not constructed by a licensed manufacturer or remanufacturer. A specially constructed vehicle may be built from (1) a kit; (2) new or used, or a combination of new and used, parts; or (3) a vehicle reported for dismantling, as required by Section 5500 or 11520, which, when reconstructed, does not resemble the original make of the vehicle dismantled. A specially constructed vehicle is not a vehicle which has been repaired or restored to its original design by replacing parts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

585.

A “station wagon” is a dual purpose vehicle designed for the transportation of persons and also designed in such a manner that the seats may be removed or folded out of the way for the purpose of increasing the property carrying space within the vehicle. The term includes, but is not limited to, types of vehicles which carry the trade names of station wagon, estate wagon, town and country wagon, and country sedan. A vehicle used primarily for the transportation of cadavers to or from a funeral home, mortuary, or burial site is not a station wagon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 22.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

587.

“Stop or stopping” when prohibited shall mean any cessation of movement of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the direction of a police officer or official traffic control device or signal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1917.)
-------------------------------------------

590.

“Street” is a way or place of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. Street includes highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

A “street” or “highway” shall not include those portions of a way or place in or upon which construction, alteration, or repair work is being performed insofar as the equipment performing such work and its operation are concerned. Where the work consists of a street or highway project, the limits of the project as shown or described in the plans or specifications of the awarding body shall be so excluded with reference to the equipment actually engaged in performing the work. The authority having jurisdiction over such way or place may include any or all of the requirements set forth in Divisions 11, 12, 13, 14 and 15 in any permit issued for work on such way or place and the awarding body on any such street or highway project may include such requirements in the specifications for such project. It is the intention of the Legislature, in enacting this section, that this section shall not be construed to relieve any person from the duty of exercising due care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 659.)
-------------------------------------------

592.

“Highway”, for the purposes of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), Division 13 (commencing with Section 29000), Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500), and Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), does not include a way or place under the jurisdiction of a federal governmental agency, which lies on national forest or private lands, is open to public use, and for which the cost of maintenance of such way or place is borne or contributed to directly by any users thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

593.

“Supplemental restraint system” means an automatic passive restraint system consisting of a bag that is designed to inflate upon collision, commonly referred to as an “airbag.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

595.

“Terminal” is a place where a vehicle of a type listed in Section 34500 is regularly garaged or maintained, or from which the vehicle is operated or dispatched.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 832, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

600.

A “through highway” is a highway or portion thereof at the entrance to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is regulated by stop signs or traffic control signals or is controlled when entering on a separated right-turn roadway by a yield-right-of-way sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

“Tire traction devices” are devices or mechanisms having a composition and design capable of improving vehicle traction, braking, and cornering ability upon snow or ice-covered surfaces. Tire traction devices shall be constructed and assembled to provide sufficient structural integrity and to prevent accidental detachment from vehicles. Tire traction devices shall, at the time of manufacture or final assembly, bear a permanent impression indicating the name, initials, or trademark of the assembling company or primary manufacturer, and the country in which the devices were manufactured or assembled in final form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   Effective May 1, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

610.

“Tire tread” is that portion of the tire, consisting of the ribs and grooves, which comes in contact with the roadway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 216.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

A “toll highway” or “toll road” is a publicly owned way or place open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel which use requires the payment of a fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

(a) “Tour bus” means a bus, which is operated by or for a charter-party carrier of passengers, as defined in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code, or a passenger stage corporation, as defined in Section 226 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) “Tour bus” includes a bus described in subdivision (a) that has had its roof substantially structurally modified or removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (AB 25)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

615.

(a) A “tow truck” is a motor vehicle which has been altered or designed and equipped for, and primarily used in the business of, transporting vehicles by means of a crane, hoist, tow bar, tow line, or dolly or is otherwise primarily used to render assistance to other vehicles. A “roll-back carrier” designed to carry up to two vehicles is also a tow truck. A trailer for hire that is being used to transport a vehicle is a tow truck. “Tow truck” does not include an automobile dismantlers’ tow vehicle or a repossessor’s tow vehicle.

(b) “Repossessor’s tow vehicle” means a tow vehicle which is registered to a repossessor licensed or registered pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code that is used exclusively in the course of the repossession business.

(c) “Automobile dismantlers’ tow vehicle” means a tow vehicle which is registered by an automobile dismantler licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5 and which is used exclusively to tow vehicles owned by that automobile dismantler in the course of the automobile dismantling business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

A “tow dolly” is a vehicle towed by a motor vehicle and designed and used exclusively to transport another motor vehicle and upon which the front or rear wheels of the towed motor vehicle are mounted, while the other wheels of the towed motor vehicle remain in contact with the ground. “Tow dolly” does not include a portable or collapsible dolly used as specified in Section 4014.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

620.

The term “traffic” includes pedestrians, ridden animals, vehicles, street cars, and other conveyances, either singly or together, while using any highway for purposes of travel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

625.

A “traffic officer” is any member of the California Highway Patrol, or any peace officer who is on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000) or 11 (commencing with Section 21000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

626.

A “traffic violator school” is a business that, for compensation, provides, or offers to provide, instruction in traffic safety, including, but not limited to, classroom traffic violator curricula, for persons referred by a court pursuant to Section 42005 or to other persons who elect to attend.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

626.2.

A “traffic violator school branch or classroom location” is any place where a traffic violator school conducts instruction or maintains records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

626.4.

A “traffic violator school instructor” is any person who provides instruction to traffic violators on behalf of a traffic violator school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

626.6.

A “traffic violator school operator” is the person who directs and manages the operations of a traffic violator school.

A “traffic violator school operator” may be either the traffic violator school owner or another person designated by the traffic violator school owner to personally direct and manage the traffic violator school for the traffic violator school owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 396, Sec. 4.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

626.8.

A “traffic violator school owner” is any natural person, association, or corporation that owns a traffic violator school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 396, Sec. 5.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

627.

(a) “Engineering and traffic survey,” as used in this code, means a survey of highway and traffic conditions in accordance with methods determined by the Department of Transportation for use by state and local authorities.

(b) An engineering and traffic survey shall include, among other requirements deemed necessary by the department, consideration of all of the following:

(1) Prevailing speeds as determined by traffic engineering measurements.

(2) Accident records.

(3) Highway, traffic, and roadside conditions not readily apparent to the driver.

(c) When conducting an engineering and traffic survey, local authorities, in addition to the factors set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may consider all of the following:

(1) Residential density, if any of the following conditions exist on the particular portion of highway and the property contiguous thereto, other than a business district:

(A) Upon one side of the highway, within a distance of a quarter of a mile, the contiguous property fronting thereon is occupied by 13 or more separate dwelling houses or business structures.

(B) Upon both
 sides of the highway, collectively, within a distance of a quarter of a mile, the contiguous property fronting thereon is occupied by 16 or more separate dwelling houses or business structures.

(C) The portion of highway is longer than one-quarter of a mile but has the ratio of separate dwelling houses or business structures to the length of the highway described in either subparagraph (A) or (B).

(2) Safety of bicyclists and pedestrians, with increased consideration for vulnerable pedestrian groups including children, seniors, persons with disabilities, users of personal assistive mobility devices, and the unhoused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   (AB 43)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

630.

A “trailer” is a vehicle designed for carrying persons or property on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon any other vehicle. As used in Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), “trailer” includes a semitrailer when used in conjunction with an auxiliary dolly, if the auxiliary dolly is of a type constructed to replace the function of the drawbar and the front axle or axles of a trailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

635.

A “trailer coach” is a vehicle, other than a motor vehicle, designed for human habitation or human occupancy for industrial, professional, or commercial purposes, for carrying property on its own structure, and for being drawn by a motor vehicle. A “park trailer,” as described in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, is a trailer coach.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 566, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

636.

A “trailer bus” is a trailer or semitrailer designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of more than 15 persons, including the driver, and includes a connected towing motor vehicle that is a motor truck, truck tractor, or bus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 58, Sec. 1.   Effective April 26, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

640.

A “transferee” is a person who has acquired the sole ownership of or an equity in a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

A “transit bus” is any bus owned or operated by a publicly owned or operated transit system, or operated under contract with a publicly owned or operated transit system, and used to provide to the general public, regularly scheduled transportation for which a fare is charged. A general public paratransit vehicle is not a transit bus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1136, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

645.

(a) A “transporter” is a person engaged in the business of moving any owned or lawfully possessed vehicle by lawful methods over the highways for the purpose of delivery of such vehicles to dealers, sales agents of a manufacturer, purchasers, or to a new location as requested by the owner.
